Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,275
Food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation; unlawful operation.

It is unlawful for a person to operate a food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation in any manner which is not in conformity with the Nebraska Pure Food Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto or to interfere with the duties of the department or any final order of the director pursuant to such act.

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 44;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 56.